Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.076

Appointments to positions created by 1993 c 420 s 1—Election—Appointment—Terms of office.

(1) Any judicial position created by *section 1, chapter 420, Laws of 1993 shall be effective only if that position is specifically funded and is referenced by division and district in an omnibus appropriations act.

(2)(a) The full term of office for the judicial positions authorized pursuant to chapter 420, Laws of 1993 shall be six years.

(b) The authorized judicial positions shall be filled at the general election in the November immediately preceding the beginning of the full term except as provided in (d) and (e) of this subsection.

(c) The six-year terms shall be staggered as follows: In the first division, the initial full terms of six years for the two positions in district 1 shall begin the second Monday in January following the general election held in November 2000. If the effective date for the judicial positions are later than the deadline to include it in the November 2000 election, the initial full term shall begin the second Monday in January following the general election held in November 2006.

(d) Upon becoming effective pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the governor shall appoint judges to the additional judicial positions authorized in section 1, chapter 420, Laws of 1993. The appointed judges shall hold office until the second Monday in January following the general election following the effective date of the position. The appointed judges and other judicial candidates are entitled to run for the judicial position at the general election following appointment.

(e) The initial election for these positions shall be held in November following the effective date of the position. If the initial election of a newly authorized position is not held on a date which corresponds to the beginning of a full term as specified in (c) of this subsection, the election shall be for a partial term.

[ 1998 c 26 s 1; 1993 c 420 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Section 1, chapter 420, Laws of 1993 was not referenced in a 1993 omnibus appropriations act.

Effective date—1993 c 420: See note following RCW 2.06.020.